Hawaii statutes.
§488-6 Investments of certain plans.
No plan promising or offering to pay for legal services in an amount equal to
or in excess of $25 a year shall invest any of its assets other than as
authorized and provided for in respect to domestic insurance companies and
societies under chapters 431 and 432, which provisions are hereby extended to
and made applicable to prepaid legal service plans. [L 1976, c 156, pt of §1;
am L 2008, c 19, §76]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next